Illinois, session 104th, SB1917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Defending Education Transparency and Ending Rogue 6Regimes Engaging in Nefarious Transactions (DETERRENT) Act. 7    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Affiliated entity" means an entity or organization that 9operates primarily for the benefit of, or under the auspices 10of, such institution, including a foundation of the 11institution or a related entity, including, but not limited 12to, any educational, cultural, or language entity.13    "Attributable country" means:14        (1) the country of citizenship of a foreign source who 15    is a natural person, or, if such country is unknown, the 16    principal residence, as applicable, of such foreign 17    source; or18        (2) the country of incorporation of a foreign source 19    that is a legal entity, or, if such country is unknown, the 20    principal place of business, as applicable, of such 21    foreign source.22    "Contract" means:23        (1) any agreement for the acquisition by purchase,   SB1917- 2 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    lease, or barter of property or services by the foreign 2    source;3        (2) any affiliation, agreement, or similar transaction 4    with a foreign source that involves the use or exchange of 5    an institution's name, likeness, time, services, or 6    resources; and7        (3) any agreement for the acquisition by purchase, 8    lease, or barter, of property or services from a foreign 9    source, other than an arms-length agreement for such 10    acquisition from a foreign source that is not a foreign 11    country of concern or a foreign entity of concern; and12"Contract" does not include an agreement made between an 13institution and a foreign source regarding any payment of one 14or more elements of a student's cost of attendance, unless 15such an agreement is made for more than 15 students or is made 16under a restricted or conditional contract.17    "Board" means the Board of Higher Education.18    "Foreign county of concern" means:19        (1) a country that is a covered nation, as defined in 20    Section 4872(d) of Title 10 of the United States Code;21        (2) any country that the United States Secretary of 22    Education, in consultation with the United States 23    Secretary of Defense, the United States Secretary of 24    State, and the United States Director of National 25    Intelligence, determines to be engaged in conduct that is 26    detrimental to the national security or foreign policy of   SB1917- 3 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    the United States.2    "Foreign entity of concern" has the meaning given such 3term in Section 10612(a) of the Research and Development, 4Competition, and Innovation Act (42 U.S.C. 19221(a)) and 5includes a foreign entity that is identified on the list 6published under Section 1286(c)(8)(A) of the John S. McCain 7National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2019 (10 8U.S.C. 22 4001 note; Public Law 115-232).9    "Foreign source" means10        (1) a foreign government, including an agency of a 11    foreign government;12        (2) a legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created 13    under the laws of a foreign state or states;14        (3) a legal entity, governmental or otherwise, 15    substantially controlled by a foreign source, as described 16    in Section 668.174(c)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of 17    Federal Regulations or successor regulations;18        (4) a natural person who is not a citizen or a national 19    of the United States or a trust territory or protectorate 20    thereof;21        (5) an agent of a foreign source, including:22            (A) a subsidiary or affiliate of a foreign legal 23        entity, acting on behalf of a foreign source;24            (B) a person that operates primarily for the 25        benefit of, or under the auspices of, a foreign 26        source, including a foundation or a related entity,   SB1917- 4 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1        such as any educational, cultural, or language entity; 2        and3            (C) a person who is an agent of a foreign 4        principal, as defined in Section 1 of the federal 5        Foreign Agents Registration Act of 1938; and6        (6) an international organization, as such term is 7    defined in the federal International Organizations 8    Immunities Act.9    "Gift" means any gift of money, property, resources, 10staff, or services. "Gift" does not include:11        (1) any payment of one or more elements of a student's 12    cost of attendance, as defined in Section 472 of the 13    federal Higher Education Act, to an institution by, or 14    scholarship from, a foreign source who is a natural 15    person, acting in their individual capacity and not as an 16    agent for, at the request or direction of, or on behalf of, 17    any person or entity, except the student, made for not 18    more than 15 students, and that is not made under a 19    restricted or conditional contract with such foreign 20    source;21        (2) assignment or license of registered industrial and 22    intellectual property rights, such as patents, utility 23    models, trademarks, or copyrights, or technical 24    assistance, that are not associated with a category listed 25    in the Commerce Control List maintained by the Bureau of 26    Industry and Security of the Department of Commerce and   SB1917- 5 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    set forth in Supplement No. 1 to Part 774 of Title 15 of 2    the Code of Federal Regulations; or3        (3) decorations, as defined in Section 7342(a) of 4    Title 5 of the United States Code.5    "Institution" includes, but is not limited to, 6institutions falling under the Private Business and Vocational 7Schools Act of 2012, the Private College Act, and public 8institutions of higher education as defined in Section 1 of 9the Board of Higher Education Act.10    "Investment of concern" means any specified interest with 11a foreign country of concern or a foreign entity of concern.12    "Private institution" means a privately-operated college, 13junior college or university offering degrees and instruction 14above the high school level either in residence or by 15correspondence.16    "Restricted or conditional gift or contract" means any 17endowment, gift, grant, contract, award, present, or property 18of any kind which includes provisions regarding:19        (1) the employment, assignment, or termination of 20    faculty;21        (2) the establishment of departments, centers, 22    institutes, instructional programs, research or lecture 23    programs, or new faculty positions;24        (3) the selection, admission, or education of 25    students;26        (4) the award of grants, loans, scholarships,   SB1917- 6 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    fellowships, or other forms of financial aid restricted to 2    students of a specified country, religion, sex, ethnic 3    origin, or political opinion; or4        (5) any other restriction on the use of a gift or 5    contract.6    "Specified interest" means:7        (1) stock or any other equity or profits interest of 8    such entity;9        (2) debt issued by such entity; and10        (3) any contract or derivative with respect to any 11    property described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this 12    definition. 13    Section 10. Disclosures of foreign gifts. 14    (a) An institution shall file a disclosure report annually 15on July 1 following a year when:16        (1) an institution received a gift from, or entered 17    into a contract with, a foreign source, other than a 18    foreign country of concern or foreign entity of concern, 19    with a value of $50,000 or more, or an undetermined value;20        (2) an institution receives a gift from a foreign 21    country of concern or foreign entity of concern of any 22    dollar amount;23        (3) an institution enters into a contract with a 24    foreign country of concern or foreign entity of concern 25    after receiving a waiver for such contract; or  SB1917- 7 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1        (4) an institution is substantially controlled by a 2    foreign source.3    A gift to, or contract with, an affiliated entity of an 4institution shall be considered a gift to or contract with 5such institution.6    (b) All disclosure reports shall contain the following:7        (1) the name of the individual, department, or 8    benefactor at the institution receiving the gift or 9    carrying out the contract;10        (2) the intended purpose of the gift or contract;11        (3) a description of any restrictions or conditions on 12    the contract;13        (4) if a gift, the date received and the fair market 14    dollar amount of the gift; and15        (5) if a contract, the start and end date of the 16    contract.17    (c) In addition to other requirements, disclosure reports 18regarding gifts from or contracts with foreign governments 19shall contain:20        (1) the name of the government;21        (2) the department, agency, office, or division of the 22    foreign government that approved the gift or contract;23        (3) the physical mailing address of the relevant 24    foreign government department, agency, office, or 25    division.26    (d) In addition to other requirements, disclosure reports   SB1917- 8 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1regarding gifts from or contracts with foreign sources that 2are not foreign governments or foreign entities of concern 3shall contain the following:4        (1) the legal name of the source, or if unavailable, a 5    signed statement that the institution has reasonably 6    attempted to obtain such a name;7        (2) if the source is a person, the country of 8    citizenship or, if not known, the principal country of 9    residence;10        (3) if the source is a legal entity, the country of 11    incorporation or, if not known, the principal place of 12    business; and13        (4) the physical mailing address of the source, or if 14    unavailable, a signed statement that the institution has 15    reasonably attempted to obtain such address.16    (e) In addition to all other requirements, disclosure 17reports regarding contracts with foreign governments of 18concern or foreign entities of concern shall contain the 19following:20        (1) a complete and unredacted text of the original 21    contract translated into English;22        (2) a copy of the waiver from the Secretary allowing 23    such a contract; and24        (3) the statement submitted by the institution to 25    receive such a waiver.26    (f) In addition to all other requirements, disclosure   SB1917- 9 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1reports regarding institutions substantially controlled by a 2foreign source must also report:3        (1) the legal name and address of the foreign source 4    that owns or controls the institution;5        (2) the date on which the foreign source assumed 6    ownership or control; and7        (3) any changes in program or structure resulting from 8    the change in ownership or control.9    Any translations must be done by a person who is not 10affiliated with the foreign source.11    (g) No later than 60 days before the July 1 immediately 12following the date of effective date of this Act, the Board 13shall establish and maintain a searchable, public database on 14the Board's website. This database shall:15        (1) contain all reports submitted, uploaded to the 16    database by the Board no later than 30 days after 17    submission;18        (2) include, in electronic and downloadable format, 19    any information provided in such reports, excluding the 20    names and addresses prohibited from being disclosed;21        (3) be searchable and sortable by date filed, date of 22    the gift received or contract entered into, by 23    attributable country of the gift or contract, and by 24    institution;25        (4) indicate whether a gift is from a foreign 26    government or from a foreign source that is not a foreign   SB1917- 10 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    government; and2        (5) indicate when a report does not contain the name 3    or address of a foreign source.4    Names and addresses of foreign sources shall not be 5disclosed under such public database or under Freedom of 6Information Act requests.7    (h) Institutions must designate a compliance officer who 8is a current employee or legally authorized agent and is 9responsible for personally certifying compliance. 10    Section 15. Prohibitions on contracts with certain foreign 11entities and countries. An institution may not enter into any 12contracts with foreign entities of concern or countries of 13concern. Institutions may, 60 days prior to entering into a 14contract, submit a waiver request to the Board. Waivers shall 15last for one year. Institutions may apply for renewals of 16waivers for contracts that remain unchanged. If an institution 17is not granted a waiver, it must not enter into the contract or 18terminate it. The Board shall notify the institution within 60 19days of the waiver approval or denial.20    If an institution has a contract with an entity that is 21designated as an entity of concern during the contract, the 22institution has 60 days to withdraw from the contract. 23    Section 20. Investment disclosure report. Private 24institutions with endowments above $6,000,000,000 or with   SB1917- 11 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1investments of concern above $250,000,000 shall report the 2following:3        (1) a list of the investments of concern purchased, 4    sold, or held during such calendar year;5        (2) the aggregate fair market value of all investments 6    of concern held as of the close of such calendar year;7        (3) the combined value of all investments of concern 8    sold over the course of such calendar year, as measured by 9    the fair market value of such investments at the time of 10    the sale; and11        (4) the combined value of all capital gains from such 12    sales of investments of concern. 13    Section 25. Enforcement. If it appears that an institution 14has knowingly or willfully failed to comply, a civil action 15may be brought by the Attorney General, at the request of the 16Board, in an appropriate district court of the United States, 17or the appropriate United States court of any territory or 18other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, 19to request such court to compel compliance.20    An institution that is compelled to comply shall pay the 21full costs to the Board of obtaining compliance with the 22requirement of such section, including all associated costs of 23investigation and enforcement.24    In addition to paying the cost of enforcement, an 25institution shall also be subject to the following fines from   SB1917- 12 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1the Board. 2    Section 30. Violations of Section 10.3        (1) First time violations shall be no less than 4    $50,000 but not more than the monetary value of the gift 5    from, or contract with, the foreign source.6        (2) In the case of a gift or contract of no value or of 7    indeterminable value, the fine shall be not less than 1% 8    and not more than 10% of the total amount of federal funds 9    received. Violations from institutions substantially 10    controlled by a foreign source shall be no less than 10% of 11    the total amount of federal funds received.12        (3) Subsequent violations shall be no less than 13    $100,000 but not more than twice the monetary value of the 14    gift from, or contract with, the foreign source.15        (4) In the case of a gift or contract of no value or of 16    indeterminable value, the subsequent fine shall be not 17    less than 10% of the total amount of federal funds 18    received.19        (5) Subsequent violations from institutions 20    substantially controlled by a foreign source shall be no 21    less than 20% of the total amount of federal funds 22    received. 23    Section 35. Violations of Section 15.24        (1) First time violations shall be not less than 5%   SB1917- 13 -LRB104 09647 LNS 19713 b1    and not more than 10% of the total amount of federal funds 2    received by the institution.3        (2) Subsequent violations shall be not less than 20% 4    of the total amount of federal funds received. 5    Section 40. Violations of Section 20.6    (1) First time violations shall be not less than 50% and 7not more than 100% of the sum of the aggregate fair value 8market value of all investments of concern held and sold by 9such institution at the close of the calendar year.10    (2) Subsequent violations shall be not less than 100% and 11not more than 200% of the sum of the aggregate fair value 12market value of all investments of concern held and sold by 13such institution at the close of the calendar year.